Illinois, session 104th, SB2948.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The State Finance Act is amended by adding 5Section 5.1038 as follows: 6    (30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new)7    Sec. 5.1038. The Mobile Panic Alert System Grant Fund. 8    Section 10. The School Safety Drill Act is amended by 9adding Sections 42 and 43 as follows: 10    (105 ILCS 128/42 new)11    Sec. 42. Mobile panic alert systems. 12    (a) School districts and private schools in this State 13shall consider the use of a mobile panic alert system in the 14development of their school emergency and crisis response 15plans. The mobile panic alert system, if used, shall be known 16as "Alyssa's Alert" and shall be capable of connecting to 17diverse emergency service technologies to ensure real-time 18coordination between multiple first responder agencies. The 19mobile panic alert system, if used, must be capable of 20integrating with local, public-safety, answering-point 21infrastructures to transmit 9-1-1 calls and mobile   SB2948- 2 -LRB104 16301 AAS 29686 b1activations.2    (b) The State Board of Education shall conduct market 3research, in consultation with the Illinois Emergency 4Management Agency, to identify whether an existing market of 5supply of mobile panic alert systems that satisfy the 6requirements of subsection (a) is available in this State from 7multiple vendors for use by school districts.8    (c) The State Board of Education, in consultation with the 9Illinois State Police and the Illinois Emergency Management 10Agency, shall develop standards for a mobile panic alert 11system. The standards must take into consideration the 12following:13        (1) the scalability of the mobile panic alert system 14    in relation to the possibility of school expansion;15        (2) the reliability of the connection technology used 16    and how that technology prevents poor connectivity from 17    severely affecting the response time for first responders;18        (3) the ease of integrating the mobile panic alert 19    system into existing safety systems in a way that ensures 20    communication with first responders and that all safety 21    protocols are working together; and22        (4) the efficiency of providing instant alerts and 23    notifications to first responders and other school 24    personnel.25    (d) The State Board of Education shall send a physical and 26electronic notification to school districts on which mobile   SB2948- 3 -LRB104 16301 AAS 29686 b1panic alert systems in this State meet the standards developed 2by the State Board of Education under subsection (c). 3    (105 ILCS 128/43 new)4    Sec. 43. Mobile Panic Alert System Grant Fund. 5    (a) Subject to appropriation, the State Board of Education 6shall establish and administer a Mobile Panic Alert System 7Grant Program. School districts and private schools may apply 8to the State Board of Education for a Program grant to obtain a 9mobile panic alert system under Section 42 in order to better 10prepare for emergency responses. Program grants shall be 11awarded from moneys appropriated for that purpose from the 12Mobile Panic Alert System Grant Fund.13    (b) The Mobile Panic Alert System Grant Fund is created as 14a special fund in the State treasury. All money in the Mobile 15Panic Alert System Grant Fund shall be used, subject to 16appropriation, by the State Board of Education for the Mobile 17Panic Alert System Grant Program. 18    (c) A mobile panic alert system obtained through a Program 19grant must be compliant with the standards developed by the 20State Board of Education under subsection (c) of Section 42.  SB2948- 4 -LRB104 16301 AAS 29686 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    30 ILCS 105/5.1038 new4    105 ILCS 128/42 new5    105 ILCS 128/43 new